Massachusetts, session 194th, H2398.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 24N the following section:- 
24P: Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Dementias Awareness 
Section 24P. (a) The Department of Public Health, in partnership with the Executive 
Office of Elder Affairs and the Massachusetts Advisory Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All 
Other Dementias, shall develop a public awareness campaign on brain health, Alzheimer’s 
disease and related dementias, and incorporate the campaign into its existing, relevant public 
health outreach programs on an ongoing basis. The public awareness campaign shall: 
(i) educate health care providers on the importance of early detection and timely 
diagnosis of cognitive impairment, validated cognitive assessment tools, current and emerging 
treatment options, the value of a Medicare Annual Wellness visit for cognitive health, and the 
Medicare care planning billing code for individuals with cognitive impairment;  

of 5 13  (ii) increase public understanding and awareness of early warning signs of Alzheimer's 
disease and other types of dementia, the value of early detection and diagnosis, and how to 
reduce the risk of cognitive decline, particularly among persons in diverse communities who are 
at greater risk of developing Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia; and  
(iii) inform health care professionals and the general public of dementia care coordination 
services for those living with Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias and other resources and 
services available to individuals living with dementia and their families and caregivers, in 
partnership with the Executive Office of Elder Affairs, and the Massachusetts Advisory Council 
on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other Dementias.  
(b). The department shall strive to provide uniform, consistent guidance on Alzheimer’s 
and other dementia in nonclinical terms, with an emphasis on cultural relevancy and health 
literacy, specifically targeting diverse populations who are at higher risk for developing dementia 
in its public awareness and educational outreach programs.  
SECTION 2. Section 16AA of Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as amended by Section 7 
of Chapter 154 of the Acts of 2018 is hereby further amended in subsection (f) by inserting after 
the words “shall detail such progress on a regional basis” the following:- 
The annual report shall include data on the racial and ethnic disparities in morbidity and 
mortality rates for Alzheimer’s disease and related dementias and other diseases identified by the 
Office of Health Equity.  
SECTION 3. Said section 16AA of Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as amended by 
Section 1 of Chapter 2020 of the Acts of 2018, is hereby further amended by inserting after (3) 
the following section:-  

of 5 35  (4) The department of public health shall include the Caregiver Module and Cognitive 
Decline Module in the annual Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance System (BRFSS) survey on a 
rotating annual basis to collect prevalence data, track trends over time and analyze data to direct 
public health programs and resources. 
SECTION 4. Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 16FF the following section:- 
Section 16GG: Massachusetts Director of Dementia Care and Coordination 
Section 16GG. (a) The position of Director of Dementia Care and Coordination is created 
within the Executive Office of Health and Human Services. The Secretary of Health and Human 
Services shall appoint the director who shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary. The director 
may call upon appropriate agencies of the state government for assistance as is needed. Duties 
and responsibilities of the director shall include, but not be limited to, the following:  
(b) Coordinate the successful implementation of the Alzheimer’s Disease State Plan. 
(c) In coordination with relevant departments and Chair of the Massachusetts Advisory 
Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other Dementias, support the council’s work and 
annual updates to the Alzheimer’s state plan.   
(d) Coordinate the public awareness efforts as directed in Section 1; Facilitate and 
support coordination of outreach programs and services between agencies, area agencies on 
aging, aging services access points and other interested groups for the purpose of fostering public 
awareness and education regarding Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia.  

of 5 55  (e) Coordinate with relevant state agencies and organizations to ensure coordination of 
services, access to services and a high quality of care for individuals with dementia and their 
family caregivers to meet the needs of the affected population and prevent duplication of 
services; Facilitate coordination of services and activities between organizations interested in 
dementia programs and services, including, but not limited to, area agencies on aging, aging 
services access points, service providers, advocacy groups, legal services, emergency personnel 
and law enforcement.   
(f) Assess dementia-related training requirements for healthcare, long term care and home 
and community based services professionals on a biannual basis, including hours required, 
frequency of training required and content of training, to determine whether existing training 
requirements meet the needs of the dementia community in Massachusetts; the assessment shall 
also include whether trainings incorporate Dementia Care Practice Recommendations and person 
centered care best practices; Upon completion of the assessment, provide recommendations to 
the Department of Public Health, the Executive Office of Elder Affairs, the Massachusetts 
Advisory Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other Dementias, the Board of Registration in 
Nursing and the Board of Registration in Medicine for additional training necessary to 
adequately support the dementia community in Massachusetts.  
(g) Work with the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health, the Board of 
Registration in Nursing and the Board of Registration in Medicine to ensure healthcare 
professionals are in compliance with dementia training requirements; work with the 
Commissioner of the Department of Public Health to ensure that hospitals are dementia capable 
and in compliance with Chapter 220 of the General Laws. 

of 5 77  (h) Identify and manage grants to assist Massachusetts in becoming dementia-capable.  
(i) Collect, monitor and report on data related to the impact of Alzheimer's disease in the 
commonwealth; work with the Department's Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance System 
Coordinator in identifying available funds to execute appropriate modules for critical data 
collection and research; coordinate with the Department of Public Health to improve public 
health outcomes utilizing relevant dementia data. 
SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.